Maine, session 132, LD328.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§7, ¶N is enacted to read:
N. Beginning January 1, 2026, the State, through the commission, shall pay 100% of
a retiree's Medicare Part B premium under the Medicare Advantage plan identified and
offered by the commission and available to the retiree as authorized by the commission
if the retiree is not eligible for federally approved Medicaid services.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §13451, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Payment by State for Medicare Part B under Medicare Advantage. Beginning
January 1, 2026, the State shall pay 100% of a retired teacher's Medicare Part B premium
under the Medicare Advantage plan administered by the Maine Education Association
benefits trust if the retired teacher is not eligible for federally approved Medicaid services.